North Dakota, session 69, HB1406.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 54-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Introduction of bills prepared by executive branch agencies and the judicial branch.
Executive branch agencies and the judicial branch may not submit a legislative bill for
introduction to the legislative assembly .
Page No. 1 25.1118.02000